Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-944
University of Nebraska; health professions programs; priorities.

The University of Nebraska's programs in the health professions shall serve the health care needs of the State of Nebraska. The University of Nebraska, in cooperation with state and regional health planning agencies, shall conduct a continuing study of the state's health care needs and adjust program services to reflect changing conditions. The University of Nebraska's health professions programs shall have as their first priority the training of physicians, dentists, nurses, pharmacists, and allied health professionals. Special emphasis and priority shall be placed on education and training of physicians for the primary care specialties of: (1) Family practice; (2) internal medicine; (3) pediatrics; and (4) obstetrics-gynecology. The second priority in the health professions programs shall be the provision of continuing education services for the health professions. The third priority for the health professions programs shall be research and public services in those areas related to the health professions.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 28.